Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-8,145
Teacher education program; baccalaureate degree, graduate degree, or professional degree; forty-eight or more semester credit hours or associate degree; temporary certificate to teach; issuance; terms and conditions.

(1) In addition to certificates issued pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815:

(a) The Commissioner of Education shall, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, grant a temporary certificate to teach on a full-time basis to any applicant who:

(i) Has completed a teacher education program at a standard institution of higher education as defined in section 79-807; and

(ii) Currently possesses a certificate to teach in good standing from another state;

(b) The commissioner may, subject to subsection (3) of this section, grant a temporary certificate to teach on a full-time basis to any applicant who:

(i) Has earned and been awarded a baccalaureate degree, graduate degree, or professional degree from a college or university accredited by an accrediting organization recognized by the United States Department of Education; and

(ii) Has passed any appropriate subject area examination as designated by the State Board of Education; and

(c) Beginning in fiscal year 2024-25, the commissioner shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, grant a temporary certificate to teach on a full-time basis to any applicant who:

(i) Has completed two years at a college or university accredited by an accrediting organization recognized by the United States Department of Education with at least forty-eight or more semester credit hours or obtained an associate degree from such a college or university;

(ii) Is employed as a paraprofessional or paraeducator at an elementary school, middle school, or high school in Nebraska; and

(iii) Has passed any appropriate subject area examination as designated by the State Board of Education.

(2) Any temporary certificate to teach issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period not to exceed two years, during which the holder of such temporary certificate must obtain a certificate to teach pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815 by completing the requirements contained in such sections.

(3) Issuance of a temporary certificate to teach pursuant to this section shall be subject to a criminal history record information check pursuant to section 79-814.01 and payment of any required fees.

Laws 2021, LB528, § 31;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 88.
September 2, 2023